North Dakota statutes. TITLE 24 Highways, Bridges, And Ferries
CHAPTER 24-02 Director of the Department of Transportation
24-02-25.2.
Actions against contractor and surety — Time.

Any person who has furnished labor, materials, or supplies and made a claim under section 24-02-25.1 has the right to commence an action to recover the amount of the person’s claim against the contractor or surety within one year of the date of the final acceptance of the project by the department.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 304, § 2.

24-02-26.
Controversies to be arbitrated — Arbitrators — How named.

A controversy arising out of a contract for the construction or repair of a highway entered by the director must be submitted to arbitration under this chapter and chapter 32-29.2. A person that voluntarily enters a contract for the construction or repair of a highway is deemed to have agreed to arbitration of a controversy arising out of that contract. For a claim for less than one hundred thousand dollars, only one arbitrator may be jointly selected by the parties. For a claim for one hundred thousand dollars or more, three persons comprise the arbitration board.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 79; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0226; S.L. 1995, ch. 261, § 1; 2011, ch. 199, § 1.

24-02-26.1.
Condition precedent to contractor demand for highway construction arbitration — Claims for extra compensation.

In addition to the provisions of section 24-02-30, full compliance by a contractor with the provisions of this section is a condition precedent to the contractor’s right to demand arbitration. If the contractor believes the contractor is entitled to additional compensation for work or materials not covered in the contract or not ordered by the engineer as extra work or force account work in accordance with the contract specifications, the contractor shall, prior to beginning the work which the claim will be based upon, notify the engineer in writing of the intent to make claim for additional compensation. If the basis for the claim does not become apparent until the contractor has commenced work on the project and it is not feasible to stop the work, the contractor shall immediately notify the engineer that the work is continuing and that written notification of the intent to make claim will be submitted within ten calendar days. Failure of the contractor to give the notification required and to afford the engineer facilities and assistance in keeping strict account of actual costs will constitute a waiver of claim for additional compensation in connection with the work already performed. Notification of a claim, and the fact that the engineer has kept account of the costs involved, may not be construed as proving or substantiating the validity or actual value of the claim.

A contractor submitting a claim for compensation under this section, personally or on behalf of another person or entity, must do so in writing, not later than ninety days after the department has submitted the final estimate to the contractor. The claim must state the monetary amount of the claim, the reason for the claim, when the loss was incurred, and a short statement of the factual situation under which the claim arose. The claim must be made under oath or equivalent affirmation.

The director shall act on claims of less than three million dollars within sixty days after the claim is served upon the director. The director shall act on claims of three million dollars or more within one hundred eighty days after the claim is served upon the director. The contractor and the director may negotiate a supplemental agreement for the claim items that are accepted by the director, and the director shall immediately pay the contractor for any additional compensation resulting from the supplemental agreement. The contractor may demand arbitration on the remaining claim items within ninety days after the contractor has been notified of the director’s action on the claim.

The contractor shall make available to the department and allow the department to examine and copy all of the contractor’s records, documents, worksheets, and other data which are pertinent to the justification of the claim and to the substantiation of all costs related to the claim. The department shall also make available to the contractor all of the department’s records, documents, worksheets, and other data which are pertinent to the department’s response to the claim.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 305, § 1; 1987, ch. 317, § 1; 1989, ch. 331, § 1; 2007, ch. 252, § 1.

24-02-27.
Arbitration demand — District court may appoint arbitrators if parties fail.

Unless a party submits the dispute to the American arbitration association, the arbitrators must be selected in accordance with this section. The party desiring arbitration of claims for more than one hundred thousand dollars shall serve a written demand upon the adverse party. The demand must designate an arbitrator and must describe and detail all claim items that are submitted to arbitration. The party served with the demand shall respond in writing within thirty days, and the response must designate a second arbitrator and must explain the respondent’s position concerning each claim item. If the respondent does not designate the second arbitrator within thirty days, the claimant may apply to the district court of the judicial district in which the project, or any part of the project, is located for the appointment of the second arbitrator. If the two arbitrators do not designate the third arbitrator within thirty days after the second arbitrator is designated, either party may apply to the district court for the appointment of the third arbitrator. The proceedings in the district court are governed by the rules of civil procedure concerning motions.

The same procedure applies to the parties for claims involving less than one hundred thousand dollars, except that the parties jointly shall select the arbitrator after the demand and response.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 80; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0227; S.L. 1983, ch. 306, § 1; 1989, ch. 331, § 2; 1995, ch. 261, § 2; 2011, ch. 199, § 2.

24-02-28.
Procedure for arbitration.

After a board of arbitration has been appointed, a submission in writing must be executed as provided in section 32-29.3-06, but the submission must provide for the entry of judgment upon the award by the district court of the county in which the improvement, or some part thereof, involved in the contract is located. The county must be specified in the submission. The submission must be executed by the director. After submission of the arbitration agreement, the arbitration must proceed in accordance with the provisions of chapter 32-29.3, unless a party submits the dispute to arbitration in accordance with the construction industry arbitration rules of the American arbitration association. If the rules of the American arbitration association conflict with North Dakota law, North Dakota law governs. The decision of the arbitrators must be in writing and must state the basis for the decision.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 81; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp. § 24-0228; S.L. 1987, ch. 408, § 21; 1995, ch. 261, § 3; 2007, ch. 252, § 2.

24-02-29.
Arbitration may proceed although one party fails to agree.

If either party refuses to submit to arbitration as provided in this chapter, that party must be deemed to have waived all claims and demands, and the arbitrators shall proceed to determine the controversies set forth by the moving party according to the justice of the case. Judgment must be entered upon the award of such arbitrators in all things the same as though the submission to arbitration has been signed by both parties.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 82; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0229.

24-02-30.
Conditions precedent to demand for arbitration against director.

No right exists to demand arbitration against the director until the conditions specified in this section have been complied with. The contractor shall give the director notice in writing that the contractor claims the contract has been or will be performed fully on a day stated, which may not be less than ten days after the giving of such notice. At the time stated in the notice the director shall cause the work to be inspected, and if the director claims the work has not been completed, the director, with all reasonable dispatch, having regard to the early completion of the work, shall specify the particulars in which it is incomplete and shall direct that it be completed accordingly, or if the director considers further work necessary to bring the project up to the desired standard for acceptance either by the director or the federal highway administration, even though the director considers such contract complete, the director likewise may specify any such additional work. The contractor shall proceed with all reasonable dispatch, having due regard to weather conditions, with the performance of all such additional work with a view to a speedy completion of the project. When the contractor claims in good faith, supported by affidavit furnished to the director, that the contractor has completed such additional work according to the specifications furnished to the contractor, and the director fails for ten days to accept such work as completed, the contractor has the right to institute proceedings under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 83; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0230; 2017, ch. 57, § 5, effective August 1, 2017.

24-02-31.
Arbitrators shall determine all controversies — May give directions.

The arbitrators shall determine all controversies between the parties growing out of the contract, including the question whether it had been performed at the time claimed by the contractor and whether the additional work required by the director as specified has been done, and if not done they shall specify the particulars in which it has not been done, give appropriate directions with reference thereto, and shall make a proper award for any extra work they find the contractor entitled to, making such award so far as it is practicable upon the basis of the contract price, having due regard to what is just and equitable between the parties under the facts and circumstances of the case.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 84; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0231.

24-02-32.
Further arbitration permitted.

If after the making of an award which requires the contractor to do further work, any controversies arise between the parties as to the doing of such work, the controversies may be submitted to the same arbitrators on five days’ notice for further determination.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, §§ 85, 86; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0232; S.L. 1989, ch. 331, § 3.

24-02-33.
Judgment against director — How collected.

When judgment has been entered against the director, the same is not collectible or enforceable by execution, but if the same provides for the payment of money by the director, it must be paid in the same manner, to the same extent, and out of the same funds as though the claims thus established had been recognized and allowed without arbitration. The performance of the duty of the director with reference to payment or other compliance with such judgment may be enforced by mandamus proceedings in the district courts of the state.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 87; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0233.

24-02-34.
Preparation of standard contract forms.

The director may prepare, adopt, or amend uniform standard forms of contracts, bonds, estimates and other forms and documents deemed essential for the efficient administration of highway matters within the department.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 88; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0234.

24-02-35.
Contracts — For road and bridge work and materials — Awarding to residents of North Dakota and giving preference to residents of North Dakota. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1959, ch. 234, § 1.

24-02-35.1.
Casual sale of road materials to local governmental units.

The department may sell road materials in small quantities on an occasional basis to local governmental units, when the local governmental units are unable to economically procure those quantities of road materials from the private sector.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 308, § 1.

24-02-35.2.
Deposit of sale proceeds — Continuing appropriation.

The proceeds from any sale of road materials made under section 24-02-35.1 must be deposited in the department of transportation fund. An amount not to exceed the total sum of the sales under section 24-02-35.1, but not to exceed one million dollars a year, may be withdrawn upon voucher of the department for purchasing road materials. All moneys deposited in the fund pursuant to this section are hereby appropriated to the department for the purposes of this section.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 308, § 1; 2009, ch. 40, § 15.

24-02-36.
State funds not used on feeder roads.

Except as provided in section 24-01-48, no state funds may be expended for feeder roads or other roads not on the state highway system except for the necessary administrative costs and for such work as is reimbursable from federal or county funds or from funds of other organizations or governmental departments for which reimbursement arrangements have been made. After completion of any such cooperative construction, all authority and control over roads off the state highway system must be returned to the local authorities under whom control was vested previously.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 113; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0236; S.L. 1959, ch. 235, § 3.

24-02-37.
State highway fund — Priorities for expenditure — Use of investment income.

The state highway fund, created by law and not otherwise appropriated and allocated, must be applied and used for the purposes named in this section, as follows:

Except for investment income as provided in subsection 3, the fund must be applied in the following order of priority:

The cost of maintaining the state highway system.

The cost of construction and reconstruction of highways in the amount necessary to match, in whatever proportion may be required, federal aid granted to this state by the United States government for road purposes in North Dakota. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the department of transportation may repay the United States department of transportation for previous related expenditures from current biennium appropriations to allow the department to reobligate the federal aid to other federal aid projects.

Any portion of the highway fund not allocated as provided in subdivisions a and b may be expended for the construction of state highways without federal aid or may be expended in the construction, improvement, or maintenance of such state highways.

All funds heretofore appropriated or hereafter appropriated or transferred to the department, whether earmarked or designated for special projects or special purposes or not, must be placed or transferred into a single state highway fund in the office of the state treasurer and any claims for money expended by the department upon warrants prepared and issued by the office of management and budget and signed by the state auditor under this title must be paid out of the state highway fund by the state treasurer; provided, however, that the commissioner shall keep and maintain complete and accurate records showing that all expenditures have been made in accordance with legislative appropriations and authorizations.

The state treasurer shall deposit the moneys in the state highway fund in an interest-bearing account at the Bank of North Dakota. The state treasurer shall deposit eighty percent of the income derived from the interest-bearing account in a special interest-bearing account in the state treasury known as the special road fund. The special road fund may be used, within the limits of legislative appropriation, exclusively for the construction and maintenance of access roads to and roads within recreational, tourist, and historical areas as designated by the special road committee. A political subdivision or state agency may request funds from the special road fund by applying to the committee on forms designated by the committee. The committee may require the political subdivision or state agency to contribute to the cost of the project as a condition of any expenditure authorized from the special road fund. Any moneys in the fund not obligated by the special road committee by June thirtieth of each odd-numbered year must be held for an additional two years after which the funds revert to the state highway fund.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 114; 1957, ch. 191, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0237; S.L. 1959, ch. 372, § 35; 1963, ch. 216, § 1; 1989, ch. 332, § 1; 1997, ch. 41, § 7; 1999, ch. 247, § 1; 2009, ch. 234, § 1; 2017, ch. 37, § 9, effective July 1, 2017.

Cross-References.

Highway tax distribution fund, see § 54-27-19.

24-02-37.1.
Special road advisory committee — Special road fund. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 41, § 11.

24-02-37.2.
Special road committee.

The special road committee consists of one member of the senate and one member of the house of representatives appointed by the chairman of the legislative management, the director of the game and fish department, the director of the parks and recreation department, and the director of the department of transportation. The director of the department of transportation is chairman of the committee. The committee must meet at the call of the director to review requests for funding from the special road fund. The committee shall decide which project requests will receive funding. The director shall provide staff services to the committee. The members of the committee who are members of the legislative assembly are entitled to compensation from the department of transportation, from moneys appropriated from the special road fund, for attendance at committee meetings at the rate provided for members of the legislative assembly for attendance at interim committee meetings and are entitled to reimbursement for expenses incurred in attending the meetings in the amounts provided by law for other state officers.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 247, § 2; 2009, ch. 482, § 97.

24-02-38.
Additional appropriation for administration expenses. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1989, ch. 72, § 25.

24-02-39.
Highway department — Building limitation. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 239, § 1.

24-02-40.
Short-term financing.

The department is hereby authorized, whenever needed, to arrange, with any state-owned or private financing agency, including the Bank of North Dakota, short-term loans in the event that construction funds on hand are insufficient to meet current obligations. Short-term financing as provided herein must be in amounts no larger than can be repaid within four years from moneys known to be due and forthcoming. In no event may such short-term financing be used in anticipation of increased federal-aid highway grants or increased state highway user revenue funds, nor may such loans be obligated for road construction that cannot be financed from a known source of income.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 224, § 1; 1993, ch. 276, § 1.

24-02-40.1.
Grant or revenue anticipation financing.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the department, whenever needed for the liberty memorial bridge improvement project and the United States highway 2 project improvements, may arrange with any state-owned or private financing agency or underwriter, including the Bank of North Dakota, grant or revenue anticipation financing through the issuance of evidences of indebtedness on such terms and conditions as the department determines if construction funds on hand are insufficient to meet current obligations or to achieve cost-savings or efficiencies in road construction. The department may refund the evidences of indebtedness as often as it is advantageous to do so. Evidences of indebtedness may be sold at public or private sale and must mature not more than fifteen years from their date or dates, and the proceeds of the sale may be invested on such terms and conditions as the department determines. Grant or revenue anticipation financing must be in amounts no larger than can be repaid from moneys known or reasonably anticipated to be due and forthcoming. The grant or revenue anticipation financing may not be used in anticipation of increased federal aid highway grants or increased state highway user revenue funds, and the financing may not be obligated for road construction that cannot be financed from known sources of grants or revenue. The department may pledge any federal aid grants received or to be received for debt service and related issuance costs for evidences of indebtedness issued under this section directly to a trustee in trust for payment to holders of the evidences of indebtedness. The department may also pledge any biennially appropriated revenues for debt service on the evidences of indebtedness directly to a trustee in trust for payment to holders of the evidences of indebtedness. Any evidences of indebtedness issued under this section are not general obligations or debt of the state, the department, or any public officer or employee of the department or this state. The principal of and interest on the evidences of indebtedness are limited obligations payable solely from grants or revenues received or to be received by the department. The department may capitalize from proceeds of the evidences of indebtedness all expenses incidental to issuing the evidences of indebtedness, including any reserves for payment of the evidences of indebtedness.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 40, § 8.

24-02-41.
Department revenues to state highway fund.

All revenue in the form of charges, reimbursements, or earnings as hereinafter specified, accruing to the department or any of its agencies or divisions, must be collected and received by the director or the director’s agent, and deposited with the state treasurer monthly, who shall credit all such deposits to the state highway fund:

Overload fees or charges, permit fees, proceeds from sales, and reimbursements from other entities.

Service fees and charges for furnishing documents, material, information, or performing work at the request of, or for the convenience of other entities.

Income resulting from ownership of rights or properties.

Funds collected pursuant to a reciprocal or other agreement, which are in lieu of mile tax.

Other income resulting from authorized activities of the department and the discharge of its statutory responsibilities.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 199, § 1; 1977, ch. 231, § 1.

24-02-42.
Scholarships authorized.

The director is authorized to establish continuing grants of financial aid for study in undergraduate coursework, which meets the needs and mission of the department, at institutions of higher learning in this state. Expenditure from highway operating funds is authorized. No individual may receive financial aid in any year exceeding the tuition of the institution for which the student is enrolled. The director shall establish the annual expenditure in the department’s budget, which includes individual student financial aid limitations to be determined by the director dependent on the available funds. Before any student shall receive the financial aid authorized by this section, the student shall enter into a contract with the department, which must provide that such student shall upon graduation accept employment with the department for a period of time at least equal to the time the student received financial aid benefits, the salary to be in the grade established for the classification assigned. In the event such student is inducted into the armed forces before graduation, such education may then be completed upon that student’s return to civil life, and in the event such induction into the armed services is made after graduation the employment contract does not take effect until after such period of service in the armed forces has been completed. Leave of absence without pay will be granted to one whose induction occurs during the period of the life of such contract and the employment will be resumed for the balance of the contract period after such employee has been discharged from the service.

If such student fails to graduate with a degree, or fails to accept employment with the department as above provided, such student shall repay the department, with interest at the rate of six percent per annum, all sums received by the student in financial aid benefits under the contract herein provided, such repayment to be made within a period equal to the time the student received such benefits. For the purpose of this section, defenses of minority or statute of limitations are removed as to any applicant granted a loan by the director and such contracts are in all respects legal and binding. Salary increases to employees having received financial aid by virtue of this section must be based on the same considerations as other employees employed by the department.

The director, with the cooperation and concurrence of the board of higher education, shall prescribe rules for determining the selection of recipients, qualifications, and courses of study. Such rules may cover any areas as may be necessary to assure a source of qualified trained employees for the department.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 206, § 1; 1971, ch. 268, § 1; 1977, ch. 231, § 2; 1985, ch. 304, § 1; 1991, ch. 289, § 2; 2001, ch. 253, § 1; 2009, ch. 235, § 1.

24-02-43.
Intergovernmental cooperation — Infrastructure bank.

The director may contract and cooperate with other states, with political subdivisions of this state, and with the United States government to establish, maintain, and operate a multistate infrastructure bank pursuant to section 350 of the National Highway System Designation Act of 1995 [Pub. L. 104-59; 109 Stat. 568, 618-622] and the Department of Transportation and Related Agencies Appropriations Act of 1997 [Pub. L. 104-205, title I]. The director may transfer and commit to the multistate infrastructure bank state and federal-aid highway funds, up to a maximum of ten percent of eligible federal-aid highway funds, and the required state matching funds. All funds and revenue allocated or generated under this section must be used for purposes of funding eligible projects as determined by agreement of the members of the multistate infrastructure bank and as authorized by state and federal law.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 41, § 6.

24-02-44.
Authority to borrow funds for a disaster — Appropriation.

The department of transportation, subject to the approval of the emergency commission, may borrow moneys from the Bank of North Dakota to advance and match federal emergency relief funds. Any moneys borrowed from the Bank of North Dakota pursuant to this section are appropriated.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 254, § 1; 2003, ch. 12, § 4; 2009, ch. 40, § 16.

24-02-45.
Cooperative agreements with counties or cities.

The director may enter an agreement with a county or city for the cooperative or joint administration of an activity that will enhance the efficiency and effectiveness of the state highway system. The terms of the agreement supersede sections 24-02-36 and 24-02-37 or any other state law governing the use of state, county, or city highway funds.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 222, § 1.

24-02-45.1.
Cooperative agreements with private entities for the construction of certain items on the state highway system.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the director may enter a cooperative agreement with a private entity for the construction of an item on the state highway system which will benefit the private entity and the traveling public, as determined by the director. The private entity’s cost-share of the items requested to be added to the state highway system must be paid for in advance of the construction by the private entity before the department can construct the project. Funds received by the department pursuant to this section must be deposited in the state highway fund as prescribed by section 24-02-41 and are appropriated to the department. If the department requires engineering or contracting services for a project under this section, it may provide the services or procure the services in accordance with section 24-02-07.3 and 24-02-17.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 202, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 12, § 8, effective May 2, 2019.

24-02-45.2.
Lease agreements with public and private entities for radio tower space — Continuing appropriation.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the director may lease space on the forty-five department-owned radio tower locations in existence on December 31, 2020, to private entities, if the private entities have been unable to secure space on an existing tower that would provide comparable service coverage. The director shall ensure market rates are charged for a lease entered with a private entity after June 30, 2021. Funds received by the department pursuant to this section must be deposited in the state highway fund as prescribed by section 24-02-41 and are appropriated to the department on a continuing basis.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 217, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

24-02-45.3.
Cooperative agreements — Federal transportation-related aid and safety and mobility.

The director may enter into cooperative agreements with any transferee under section 54-27-19 or any federal agency operating a national park and may expend highway fund moneys pursuant to legislative appropriations to match federal funds for the purposes of providing assistance with the assessment, design, and construction of projects to improve the safety and mobility of people or goods in the state.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 15, § 27, effective July 1, 2021.

24-02-46.
Multistate highway transportation agreement.

The director may join the multistate highway transportation agreement to promote uniformity among participating jurisdictions in vehicle size and weight standards. The legislative council shall review the guidelines for eligible voting members of the cooperating committee formed by the agreement and the legislative management shall appoint a member of the house standing transportation committee and a member of the senate standing transportation committee or their designees as the legislative members representing this state to the cooperating committee formed by the agreement.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 12, § 9; 2009, ch. 482, § 16.

Effective Date.

This section became effective July 1, 2007.

24-02-47.
Contracts — Design-build method. [Expired]

Expired under S.L. 2009, ch. 236, § 16.

24-02-48.
Use of department of transportation airplanes.

Upon request, the department of transportation shall provide air transportation services to other state agencies. Unless waived by the department, each agency using air transportation services from the department shall pay a user charge determined by the department of transportation. The department shall give priority to requests for air transportation services from the attorney general’s office when the request is for law enforcement purposes. The director of the department of transportation shall allow employees of other state agencies to operate the department’s airplanes for official purposes if the employee is properly licensed and has the proper rating and type endorsement to operate the requested airplane.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 221, § 2.

24-02-50.
Criminal record history checks.

The director of the department of transportation may require volunteers and final applicants for employment to submit to a statewide and nationwide criminal history record check. The nationwide criminal history record check must be conducted in the manner provided by section 12-60-24.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 218, § 2, effective August 1, 2021.